Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-481
Driving rules; publication; copy; available upon request.

(1) The director shall publish on the website of the department a summary of the statutory driving rules of this state. Such summary shall contain cautionary and advisory comments as determined by the director, including a description of how to legally operate a motor vehicle in order to avoid arrest.

(2) The director may provide a copy of the summary described in subsection (1) of this section without charge upon request by a member of the public.

Laws 1937, c. 141, § 21, p. 517;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 60-426;

R.S.1943, § 60-440;

R.S.1943, (1978), § 60-440;

Laws 1981, LB 76, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-406.08;

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 31;

Laws 2022, LB750, § 50.